Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2091.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5798XS (2) 91 ms/js S.F. 2091 Section 1. Section 657.9, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. Before a person improves property acquired to establish, 3 use, and maintain a shooting range by the erection of 4 buildings, breastworks, ramparts, or other works or before a 5 person substantially changes the existing use of a shooting 6 range, the person shall obtain approval of the county zoning 7 commission or the city zoning commission, whichever is 8 appropriate. The appropriate commission shall comply with 9 section 335.8 or 414.6 . In the event a county or city does 10 not have a zoning commission, the county board of supervisors 11 or the city council shall comply with section 335.6 or 414.5 12 before granting the approval. 13 Sec. 2. REPEAL. Section 414.5, Code 2026, is repealed. 14